Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 ABORTION ââ DEFINED 2 Section 1. Section 146B.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. âAbortionâ means the termination of a human pregnancy 5 with the intent other than to produce a live birth or to 6 remove a dead fetus. âAbortionâ does not include a spontaneous 7 termination of pregnancy, commonly known as a miscarriage, if 8 not all the products of conception are expelled. 9 DIVISION II 10 INFORMED CONSENT 11 Sec. 2. Section 146A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Prior to performing an abortion, 14 a physician shall perform an in-person examination of the 15 pregnant woman including screening for indicia of coercion or 16 abuse. A physician shall, if necessary, refer the woman to an 17 appropriate health care provider for treatment consistent with 18 the examination results. 19 Sec. 3. Section 146A.1, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 20 by adding the following new paragraphs: 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âAbortionâ means the same as defined in 22 section 146B.1. 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00a. âHealth care providerâ means a 24 person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or 25 permitted by the laws of this state to administer health care 26 in the ordinary course of business or in the practice of a 27 profession. 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âPhysicianâ means the same as defined 29 in section 146B.1. 30 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 146A.2 Dispensing abortion-inducing 31 drugs ââ licensee discipline. 32 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 33 requires: 34 a. âAbortion-inducing drugâ means the same as defined in 35 -1- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 1/ 11 H.F. _____ section 146F.1. 1 b. âChemical abortionâ means the same as defined in section 2 146F.1. 3 c. âDispenseâ means the same as defined in section 146F.1. 4 d. âMedical emergencyâ means the same as defined in section 5 146A.1. 6 e. âPregnantâ or âpregnancyâ means the human female 7 reproductive condition of having a living unborn child within 8 the pregnant womanâs body throughout every stage of the unborn 9 childâs life and development, from fertilization to full 10 gestation and childbirth. 11 2. A physician who is performing or attempting to perform 12 a chemical abortion shall do all of the following prior to 13 prescribing or dispensing an abortion-inducing drug to a 14 pregnant woman: 15 a. Obtain the signature of the woman on the United States 16 food and drug administration patient agreement form required 17 for each abortion-inducing drug authorized to be manufactured 18 or sold in the United States. 19 b. Obtain written confirmation from the woman that the woman 20 has been informed of all of the following information: 21 (1) The gestational age-specific risks of abortion-inducing 22 drugs. 23 (2) The risks related to the specific abortion-inducing 24 drug or drugs to be used, including hemorrhage, failure to 25 remove all tissue of the unborn child, sepsis, sterility, and 26 possible continuation of the pregnancy. 27 (3) That the United States federal food and drug 28 administration recommends that the pregnant woman follow up 29 with the womanâs health care provider approximately seven 30 to fourteen calendar days after the administration of an 31 abortion-inducing drug to confirm complete termination of 32 pregnancy has occurred and to evaluate the degree of bleeding. 33 (4) That women using abortion-inducing drugs have suffered 34 trauma from seeing the remains of the unborn child in the 35 -2- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 2/ 11 H.F. _____ process of a chemical abortion. 1 (5) That it may be possible to reverse the intended effects 2 of a chemical abortion, but time is of the essence. 3 (6) That information on reversing the effects of a chemical 4 abortion is available on the departmentâs internet site. 5 c. Advise the pregnant woman how to access emergency 6 surgical intervention in case of an incomplete abortion, severe 7 bleeding, or other medical complications. 8 3. Subsection 2 shall not apply to a chemical abortion 9 performed in a medical emergency. 10 4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or 11 criminal liability on a woman upon whom a chemical abortion has 12 been performed. 13 5. A physician who fails to comply with this section is 14 subject to licensee discipline under chapter 148. 15 6. The board of medicine shall adopt rules pursuant to 16 chapter 17A to administer this section. 17 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 146A.3 Informational materials. 18 1. As used in this section, âchemical abortionâ means the 19 same as defined in section 146F.1. 20 2. The department shall publish on the departmentâs 21 internet site, in an easily accessible location and format, all 22 of the following: 23 a. Notice that it may be possible to reverse the effects of 24 a chemical abortion. 25 b. Information and resources on reversing the effects of a 26 chemical abortion. 27 DIVISION III 28 DISPENSING AND REPORTING ââ ABORTION-INDUCING DRUGS 29 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 146F.1 Definitions. 30 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 31 requires: 32 1. âAbortion-inducing drugâ means any of the following: 33 a. Mifepristone. 34 b. Misoprostol. 35 -3- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 3/ 11 H.F. _____ c. Any other drug, measure, or chemical approved by the 1 United States food and drug administration when prescribed or 2 administered with the intent to terminate the pregnancy of a 3 woman known to be pregnant. âAbortion-inducing drugâ includes 4 off-label use of a drug known to have abortion-inducing 5 properties, which is prescribed with the intent of causing an 6 abortion. âAbortion-inducing drugâ does not include drugs that 7 may be known to cause an abortion but that are prescribed for 8 other medical conditions. 9 2. âAbortion-inducing drug complicationâ means any physical 10 or psychological condition which, in the reasonable medical 11 judgment of a health care provider, may occur as a primary or 12 secondary result of the patientâs use of abortion-inducing 13 drugs including but not limited to: 14 a. Uterine rupture, bleeding, or hemorrhage. 15 b. Failure to actually terminate the pregnancy. 16 c. Incomplete abortion or retained tissue. 17 d. Missed ectopic pregnancy. 18 e. Infection. 19 f. Sepsis. 20 3. âChemical abortionâ means an abortion performed by the 21 administration or use of an abortion-inducing drug. 22 4. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 23 services. 24 5. âDispenseâ means to distribute, administer, or send an 25 abortion-inducing drug to the ultimate user. 26 6. âHealth care providerâ means the same as defined in 27 section 146A.1. 28 7. âHealth care settingâ means a clinic, medical office, or 29 hospital. 30 8. âHospitalâ means the same as defined in section 135B.1. 31 9. âInterested partyâ means any of the following persons: 32 a. A woman upon whom a chemical abortion was performed or 33 attempted. 34 b. The personal representative of a woman upon whom a 35 -4- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 4/ 11 H.F. _____ chemical abortion was performed or attempted. 1 10. âMedical emergencyâ means the same as defined in section 2 146A.1. 3 11. âPersonal representativeâ means an administrator or 4 an executor, or if there is no such personal representative 5 appointed, then a person legally authorized to perform 6 substantially the same functions. 7 12. âPhysicianâ means the same as defined in section 146B.1. 8 13. âPostfertilization ageâ means the same as defined in 9 section 146B.1. 10 14. âPregnancyâ or âpregnantâ means the same as defined in 11 section 146A.2. 12 15. âRural emergency hospitalâ means the same as defined in 13 section 135B.1. 14 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 146F.2 Dispensing of abortion-inducing 15 drugs ââ restrictions. 16 1. A person shall not dispense an abortion-inducing drug in 17 this state unless all of the following criteria are met: 18 a. The drug is dispensed in a health care setting directly 19 to the woman prescribed the drug. 20 b. The person dispensing the drug is authorized to do so 21 pursuant to section 147.107. 22 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to the dispensing of an 23 abortion-inducing drug in response to a medical emergency. 24 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 146F.3 Abortion-inducing drug 25 complication ââ reporting. 26 1. a. Within thirty calendar days of the date of discharge 27 or death of a woman who presented with or was treated for 28 an abortion-inducing drug complication, a hospital, rural 29 emergency hospital, or an attending physician shall file a 30 report with the department. The report shall be in a form 31 prescribed by the department and include a list of the most 32 common abortion complications and the most recent international 33 classification of diseases code as maintained by the world 34 health organization for each. The report must be completed and 35 -5- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 5/ 11 H.F. _____ signed by the womanâs attending physician and contain all of 1 the following information: 2 (1) The age of the woman who presented with or was treated 3 for an abortion-inducing drug complication. 4 (2) The state and county of residence of the woman who 5 presented with or was treated for an abortion-inducing drug 6 complication. 7 (3) The date the abortion-inducing drug was used by the 8 woman. 9 (4) The probable postfertilization age of the unborn child 10 on the date of the abortion-inducing drug complication. 11 (5) The identity of the physician who performed the 12 chemical abortion, the facility where the chemical abortion was 13 performed, and the referring physician, agency, or service, if 14 any. 15 (6) The specific complication or complications that led to 16 the treatment and the most recent international classification 17 of diseases code for each complication as maintained by the 18 world health organization, if applicable. 19 b. A report shall not contain the name of the woman or 20 other information or identifiers that would make it possible to 21 identify the woman who suffered the reported abortion-inducing 22 drug complication. 23 2. A report filed pursuant to subsection 1 shall be 24 confidential and not subject to disclosure under chapter 22. 25 3. a. On or before December 31, 2026, and every calendar 26 year thereafter, the department shall prepare a comprehensive 27 statistical report based upon the aggregated data gathered from 28 reports filed pursuant to subsection 1 for the immediately 29 preceding calendar year. The aggregated data shall be 30 anonymized to prevent public disclosure of either of the 31 following: 32 (1) The hospital, rural emergency hospital, or attending 33 physician that filed a report. 34 (2) The woman about whom a report was filed. 35 -6- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 6/ 11 H.F. _____ b. The anonymized aggregated data shall be made available to 1 the public by the department in a downloadable format on the 2 departmentâs internet site. 3 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 146F.4 Private cause of action ââ 4 strict liability. 5 1. A person who dispenses an abortion-inducing drug 6 in violation of this chapter shall be strictly liable 7 to any interested party for all damages caused by the 8 abortion-inducing drug. 9 2. In addition to compensatory or punitive damages, a 10 prevailing plaintiff who brings an action under this section is 11 entitled to all of the following: 12 a. Statutory damages in the amount of fifty thousand 13 dollars. 14 b. Court costs. 15 c. Reasonable attorney fees. 16 3. In an action brought under this section, the name and 17 other identifying characteristics of a woman who sought or 18 obtained an abortion-inducing drug shall be redacted without 19 a court order from all pleadings and documents filed in the 20 action. The court may make further orders as necessary to 21 protect the identity and privacy of the woman who sought or 22 obtained an abortion-inducing drug. 23 4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or 24 criminal liability on a woman upon whom a chemical abortion is 25 performed. 26 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 146F.5 Licensee discipline. 27 A licensee who fails to comply with this chapter is subject 28 to licensee discipline under chapter 148. 29 DIVISION IV 30 ABORTION-RELATED PROVISIONS 31 Sec. 11. Section 144.29A, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 k. The method used for an induced termination, including 34 whether mifepristone or misoprostol was used. 35 -7- LSB 5778YC (8) 91 ak/ko 7/ 11 H.F. _____ Sec. 12. Section 144.29A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. If a spontaneous termination of 3 pregnancy, whether the patient ingested mifepristone or 4 misoprostol within fourteen calendar days prior to the date of 5 the spontaneous termination of pregnancy. 6 Sec. 13. Section 144.29A, subsection 7, paragraph c, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 c. âSpontaneous termination of pregnancyâ , commonly known 9 as a miscarriage, means the occurrence of an unintended 10 termination of pregnancy at any time during the period from 11 conception to twenty weeks gestation and which is not a 12 spontaneous termination of pregnancy at any time during the 13 period from twenty weeks or greater which is reported to the 14 department as a fetal death under this chapter . 15